src/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON NJOBZA-plc !!= * __@CODE@__ similar to 2ALGA
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: NJOBZA ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: A_LASJ ;


LEXICON NJOBZA !!= * __@CODE@__ similar to 2ALGA
+Attr: flagK ;
+Sg+Nom: K;				 		! sollâ
+Cmp/SgNom: R ;
+Sg+Gen:^WG^RLEN flagK ;     		! soolâ
+Sg+Acc:^WG^RLEN flagK ;     		! soolâ
+Sg+Ill:^CSH^RLEN%>n flagK ;		! soolân
+Sg+Loc:^WG^RLEN%>st flagK ; 		! soolâst
+Sg+Com:^WG^CLEN^SVLOW%>in  flagK ;			! algáin
+Sg+Com+Use/NG:^WG^RLEN^SVLOW%>in flagK ; ! sooláin
+Sg+Abe:^WG%>ttáá flagK ;		! solâttáá


LEXICON JAAVRAS-plc !!= * __@CODE@__  
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: JAAVRAS ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: A_LASJ ;

LEXICON JAAVRAS-mal !!= * __@CODE@__  
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: JAAVRAS ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgGen:^SV^SLEN%> BEL ;


LEXICON JAAVRAS !!= * __@CODE@__  
+Attr:^WG^RLEN%>š flagK ;
+Sg+Nom:^WG^RLEN%>š flagK ; 			! jáávráš
+Sg+Gen:^SV^SLEN%>  flagK ; 	! jávráá
+Sg+Acc:^SV^SLEN%>  flagK ; 	!  jávráá
+Sg+Ill:^WG%>žân flagK ;	!  jávrážân  ! 1 'suolluužân' found in corpus, ask ML
+Sg+Loc:^SV^SLEN%>st flagK ; !   jávráást
+Sg+Com:%>in flagK ; 	! jávráin 
+Sg+Abe:^SV^SLEN%>ttáá flagK ; ! jávrááttáá 
+Cmp/SgNom:^WG^RLEN%>š RProp ; 

LEXICON SUOLLUS-plc !!= __@CODE@__ 
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: SUOLLUS ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: A_LASJ ;


LEXICON SUOLLUS !!= __@CODE@__ 
+Sg+Nom:š^RLEN flagK ; 				
+Sg+Nom:š flagK ; 				
+Sg+Gen:^SV^SLEN flagK ; 		
+Sg+Acc:^SV^SLEN flagK ;		
+Sg+Ill:^SVž^SLEN%>ân flagK ; ! suolluužân	
+Sg+Loc:^SV^SLEN%>st flagK ;	
+Sg+Com:%>in flagK ; 			
+Sg+Abe:^SV^SLEN%>ttáá flagK ; 	



LEXICON JUUVAS-plc !!= * __@CODE@__ 
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: JUUVAS_PROPCASE ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: A_LASJ ;

LEXICON JUUVAS_PROPCASE
+Attr:â^WG%>š flagK ; 			! juuvâš	 ju^RVh^RC
+Sg+Nom:â^WG^RLEN%>š flagK ; 			! juuvâš
+Sg+Gen:i5^WG^CLEN%>i flagK ; 	! juvvii
+Sg+Acc:i5^WG^CLEN%>i flagK ; 	! juvvii
+Sg+Ill:â^WG%>žân flagK ;	!  juvâžân
+Sg+Loc:i5^WG^CLEN%>ist flagK ; !   juvviist
+Sg+Com:i^WG^CLEN%>in flagK ; 	! juvvijn 
+Sg+Abe:i5^WG^CLEN%>ittáá flagK ; ! juvviittáá 
+Cmp/SgNom:â^WG%>š Rhash ;
+Cmp/SgGen:âi5^RVSH%>i Rhash ;
!+Ess:â^WG%>žin flagK ;
!+Par:â^WG%>žid flagK ;

!LEXICON JUUVAS !!= * __@CODE@__  juuhâ:juuvâ: juuvâš:juvvii WG:WG+CLEN
!+Sg+Nom:â^WG%>š flagK ; 			! juuvâš
!+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:â%>š flagK ; 			! juuvvâš
!+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:a^WG%>š flagK ; 			! juuvaš
!+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:á^WG%>š flagK ; 			! juuváš
!+Sg+Gen:i^WG^CLEN^RVSH%>i5  flagK ; 	! juvvii
!+Sg+Acc:i^WG^CLEN^RVSH%>i5  flagK ; 	! juvvii
!+Sg+Ill:â^WG^RVSH%>žân flagK ;	!  juvâžân
!+Sg+Loc:i^WG^CLEN^RVSH%>i5st flagK ; !   juvviist
!+Sg+Com:i^WG^CLEN^RVSH%>jn flagK ; 	! juvvijn 
!+Sg+Abe:^WG^CLEN^RVSH%>iittáá flagK ; ! juvviittáá 
!+Cmp/SgNom:â^WG^RVSH%>š RProp ; ! juvâš


LEXICON VUONAS-plc !!= * __@CODE@__ 
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: VUONAS ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: A_LASJ ;

LEXICON VUONAS-ani !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Ani: VUONAS ;

LEXICON VUONAS-mal !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: VUONAS ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgGen:i^WG%>i5 BEL ;


LEXICON VUONAS !!= * __@CODE@__  
+Attr:â^WG^RLEN%>š flagK ; 			! vuonâš
+Sg+Nom:â^WG%>š flagK ; 			! vuonâš
+Sg+Gen:i^WG%>i5  flagK ; 	! vuonii
+Sg+Acc:i^WG%>i5  flagK ; 	!  vuonii
+Sg+Ill:â^WG%>žân flagK ;	!  vuonâžân
+Sg+Loc:i^WG%>ist flagK ; !   vuoniist
+Sg+Com:i^WG%>jn flagK ; 	! vuonijn 
+Sg+Abe:i^WG%>jttáá flagK ; ! vuoniittáá 
+Cmp/SgNom:â^WG^RLEN%>š RProp ; 


LEXICON VUONIIH-plc !!= * __@CODE@__ Plural to VUONAS-plc
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: VUONIIH ;

LEXICON VUONIIH !!= * __@CODE@__ plural forms 
+Pl+Nom:i5%>ih flagK ;  ! vuoniih
+Pl+Gen:i5%>j flagK ;  ! vuonij
+Pl+Acc:i5%>jd flagK ; ! vuonijd
+Pl+Ill:i5%>jd flagK ; ! vvuonijd
+Pl+Loc:i5%>jn flagK ; ! vuonijn
+Pl+Com:i5%>jguin flagK ;  ! vuonijguin
+Pl+Com+Err/Orth:i5%>jgijn flagK ;  ! vuonijgijn
+Pl+Abe:i5%>jttáá flagK ;  ! vuonijttáá
+Cmp/PlNom:i5%>ih RProp ; 


LEXICON VAARAAS-plc !!= * __@CODE@__  
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: VAARAAS ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: A_LASJ ;


LEXICON VAARAAS !!= * __@CODE@__  vá^RVrá
+Sg+Nom:^WG^RLEN%>áš flagK ; 			! váárááš
+Sg+Gen:^WG^RLEN%>á  flagK ; 			! vááráá
+Sg+Acc:^WG^RLEN%>á  flagK ; 			!  vááráá
+Sg+Ill:^WG%>žân flagK ;				!  várážân
+Sg+Loc:^WG^RLEN%>ást flagK ; 			!   vááráást
+Sg+Com:^WG%>in flagK ; 				! váráin 
+Sg+Abe:^WG^RLEN%>áttáá flagK ; 		! váárááttáá 
+Pl+Nom:^WG^RLEN%>áh flagK ; 			! váárááh 
+Pl+Gen:^WG%>i flagK ; 					! várái
+Pl+Acc:^WG%>id flagK ; 				! váráid 
+Pl+Ill:^WG%>id flagK ; 				! váráid 
+Pl+Loc:^WG%>in flagK ; 				! váráid 
+Cmp/SgNom:á^WG^RLEN%>š RProp ; 



LEXICON LAADUS-plc !!= * __@CODE@__ 
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: LAADUS ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: A_LASJ ;

LEXICON LAADUS !!= * __@CODE@__  
+Attr:u^WG^RLEN%>š flagK ; 			! lááduš
+Sg+Nom:u^WG^RLEN%>š flagK ; 			! lááduš
+Sg+Gen:u^VBACK%>u  flagK ; 	! ladduu
+Sg+Acc:u^VBACK%>u  flagK ; 	!  ladduu
+Sg+Ill:u^VBACK%>užân flagK ;	!  ladduužân
+Sg+Loc:u^VBACK%>ust flagK ; !   ladduust
+Sg+Com:u^VBACK%>in flagK ; 	! ladduin 
+Sg+Abe:u^VBACK%>uttáá flagK ; ! vuoniittáá 
+Cmp/SgNom:u^WG%>š RProp ; 


LEXICON KALDEE-plc !!= * __@CODE@__  Similar to TAHHEE
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: KALDEE ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: A_LASJ ;

LEXICON KALDEE-org !!= * __@CODE@__  Similar to TAHHEE
+N+Prop+Sem/Org: KALDEE ;


LEXICON KALDEE !!= * __@CODE@__ Similar to TAHHEE
+Attr: flagK ;
+Sg+Nom: flagK ;				! tahhee
+Sg+Gen: flagK ;				! tahhee
+Sg+Acc: flagK ;				! tahhee
+Sg+Ill:^SVSH%>i3 flagK ;		! tahhei ! stem e > 0
+Sg+Loc:^SVSH%>st flagK ; 		! tahhest ! stem e > 0
+Sg+Com:^SVSH%>i3n flagK ;		! tahhein
+Sg+Abe:%>ttáá flagK ;		! tahheettáá
+Ess:^SVSH%>n	K ;			! tahhen
!+Par:^SVSH%>d	K ;			! tahhed
+Cmp/SgNom: RProp ; 

LEXICON KALDEE_PL-plc !!= * __@CODE@__  Similar to TAHHEE_PL
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: KALDEE_PL ;

LEXICON KALDEE-mal !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: KALDEE ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Cmp/N:%- MaleRelative ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgGen:^SVSH%>i3 BEL ;

LEXICON KALDEE-fem !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem: KALDEE ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Cmp/SgGen:^SVSH%>i3 BEL ;

LEXICON KALDEE_PL !!= * __@CODE@__ Similar to TAHHEE
+Pl+Nom:%>h flagK ;			! tahheeh
+Pl+Gen:^SVSH%>i3 flagK ; 		! tahhei
+Pl+Acc:^SVSH%>i3d flagK ; 		! tahheid
+Pl+Ill:^SVSH%>i3d flagK ; 		! tahheid
+Pl+Loc:^SVSH%>i3n flagK ;		! tahhein
+Pl+Com:^SVSH%>i3guin flagK ;	! tahheiguin
+Pl+Com+Err/Orth:^SVSH%>igijn flagK ;	! tahheiguin
+Pl+Abe:^SVSH%>i3ttáá flagK ; 	! tahheittáá
+Cmp/SgNom: RProp ; 



LEXICON TUPE-plc !!= * __@CODE@__  Similar to NJUNE
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: TUPE ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: A_LASJ ;


LEXICON TUPE-ani !!= * __@CODE@__  Similar to NJUNE
+N+Prop+Sem/Ani: TUPE ;


LEXICON TUPE !!= * __@CODE@__  Similar to NJUNE
+Attr: flagK ;
+Sg+Nom: flagK ;						! njuṇe
+Sg+Gen:^WG flagK ;					! njune
+Sg+Acc:^WG flagK ;					! njune
+Sg+Ill:^EA%>n flagK ;				! njuṇán # stem e>á
+Sg+Loc:^SV^WG^RLEN^SLEN%>st flagK ;	! njuuneest # earlier also^RVL
!+Sg+Com:^WG^CLEN%>in flagK ;		! njunnijn # MM + MLO hardcording
+Sg+Com:^WG^RLEN%>in flagK ;		! njuunijn # KORP, MLO+MM
+Sg+Abe:^WG%>ttáá flagK ;		! njunettáá
+Ess:^SV^CLEN^SLEN%>n flagK ;			! njunneen
!+Par:^SV^CLEN^SLEN%>d flagK ;			! njunneed
+Cmp/SgNom: RProp ; 
+Cmp/SgGen:^WG%> PERSNAME-CMPflag ;


LEXICON VASE-plc !!= * __@CODE@__  Similar to VAHE
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: VASE ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: A_LASJ ;


LEXICON VASE !!= * __@CODE@__
+Attr: flagK ;
+Sg+Nom: flagK ; 						! vahe
+Sg+Gen:^WG flagK ;					! vave
+Sg+Acc:^WG flagK ;					! vave
+Sg+Ill:^EA%>n flagK ; 				! vahan
+Sg+Loc:^SV^WG^CLEN^SLEN%>st flagK ; 	! vavveest
+Sg+Com:^WG^CLEN%>in flagK ; 		! vovvijn
+Sg+Abe:^WG%>ttáá flagK ; 			! vavettáá
+Ess:^SV^CLEN^SLEN%>n flagK ; 			! vahheen
!+Par:^SV^CLEN^SLEN%>d flagK ; 		! vahheed
+Cmp/SgNom: RProp ; 
+Cmp/SgGen:^WG%> PERSNAME-CMPflag ;


LEXICON NIJTTO-plc !!= * __@CODE@__  Similar to SIJVO
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: NIJTTO ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: A_LASJ ;


LEXICON NIJTTO  !!= * __@CODE@__
+Attr: flagK ;
+Sg+Nom: flagK ;  ! sijvo
+Sg+Gen:^WG^RLEN flagK ;  ! siijvo
+Sg+Gen+Use/NG:^WG^RVSH flagK ;  ! sijvo
+Sg+Acc:^WG^RLEN flagK ;  ! siijvo
+Sg+Acc+Use/NG:^WG^RVSH flagK ;  ! sijvo
+Sg+Ill:^CSH^RLEN%>n    flagK ;   ! siijvon
+Sg+Loc:^WG^RLEN%>st flagK ;  !siijvost
+Sg+Com:^WG^CLEN%>in flagK ;  !sijvoin
+Sg+Abe:^WG^RVSH%>ttáá flagK ;  !sijvottáá
+Ess:%>n    flagK ;  !sijvon
!+Par:%>d    flagK ; ! sijvod
+Cmp/SgNom: RProp ; 


LEXICON AALAAS-plc !!= * __@CODE@__  Similar to ALGAAS
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: AALAAS ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: A_LASJ ;


LEXICON AALAAS !!= * __@CODE@__ 
+Attr:^SV^SLEN%>š flagK ; 							! cissááš
+Sg+Nom:^SV^SLEN%>š flagK ; 							! Čilzeppelaalaaš
+Sg+Gen:^SV^SLEN flagK ; 							! Čilzeppelaalaa
+Sg+Acc:^SV^SLEN flagK ;					! Čilzeppelaalaa
+Sg+Ill:^CSH%>žân flagK ;	! Čilzeppelaalažân 
+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:^SV^SLEN^SVLOW%>žân flagK ;		! Čilzeppelaalaažân
+Sg+Loc:^SV^SLEN%>st flagK ;				! cissáást
+Sg+Com:%>in flagK ; 							! Čilzeppelaalaain
+Sg+Abe:^SV^SLEN%>ttáá flagK ; 				! Čilzeppelaalaattáá
+Ess:^SV^SLEN^SVLOW%>žin flagK ;			! cissáážin
!+Par:^SV^SLEN^SVLOW%>žid flagK ; 		! cissáážid
+Ess:%>žin flagK ;		! algažin
!+Par:%>žid flagK ;		! algažid
+Cmp/SgNom:^SV^SLEN%>š RProp ;  !FLAG?


!LEXICON NJUARGAM-plc
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: NJUARGAM ;
!
!LEXICON NJUARGAM   * __@CODE@__  Similar to 3HUKSIM
!+Sg+Nom: flagK ;               ! huksim
!+Sg+Gen: flagK ;            	! huksim   
!+Sg+Acc: flagK ;               ! huksim
!+Sg+Ill:^SLEN%>ân flagK ;     ! huksiimân
!+Sg+Loc:^SLEN%>ist flagK ;   ! huksiimist 
!+Sg+Com:^SLEN%>áin flagK ; 	! huksiimáin
!+Sg+Abe:%>ttáá flagK ;     !  huksimttáá
!+Ess:^SLEN%>in flagK ;        ! huksiimin    
!+Par:^SLEN%>id flagK ;        ! huksiimid    
!+Cmp/SgNom: RProp ;

LEXICON KIETARUOTAS-plc !!= @CODE@  3RUOTAS
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: KIETARUOTAS ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: A_LASJ ;

LEXICON KIETARUOTAS !!= @CODE@ 
+Sg+Nom:^WG^RLEN flagK ;	!  
+Attr:^WG^RLEN flagK ;	!  
+Sg+Gen: flagK ;     			! viäskár máállás^ÁI
+Sg+Acc: flagK ;    			 ! viäskár
+Sg+Ill:%>ân flagK ; 			! viäskárân
+Sg+Loc:%>ist flagK ; ! viäskárist
+Sg+Com:%>áin flagK ; ! viäskáráin
+Sg+Abe:%>ttáá flagK ; ! viäskárttáá
+Ess:^WG%>in flagK ;   ! veskirin 
!+Par:^WG%>id flagK ;	! veskirid
+Cmp/SgNom:^WG^RLEN%> RProp ; 

LEXICON SIALGAS-plc !!= * __@CODE@__  Similar to KUAVDAS
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: SIALGAS ;

LEXICON SIALGAS-mal !!= * __@CODE@__  Similar to KUAVDAS
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: SIALGAS ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Cmp/N:%- MaleRelative ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgGen:^SV^SLEN%> BEL ;

!LEXICON SIALGAS-fem !!= * __@CODE@__  Similar to KUAVDAS
!+N+Prop+Sem/Fem: SIALGAS ;

LEXICON SIALGAS !!= * __@CODE@__  
+Sg+Nom:^WG^RLEN%>š flagK ; 		! kuávdáš piäiváš
+Attr:^WG^RLEN%>š flagK ; 		! kuávdáš piäiváš
+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:â^WG^RLEN%>š flagK ; 		! kuávdâš piäivâš
+Attr+Err/Orth:â^WG^RLEN%>š flagK ; 		! kuávdâš piäivâš
+Sg+Gen:^SV^SLEN flagK ; 			! kuávdáá piäiváá
+Sg+Acc:^SV^SLEN flagK ;			! kuávdáá piäiváá
+Sg+Ill:^WG^RVSH%>žân flagK ;	! kuávdážân piäiváážân
+Sg+Ill+Use/NG:^WG^RLEN%>žân flagK ;		!  kuávdážân piäivážân
+Sg+Loc:^SV^SLEN%>st flagK ;			! kuávdáást
+Sg+Com:%>in flagK ; 			! kuávdáin
+Sg+Abe:^SV^SLEN%>ttáá flagK ; 		! kuávdááttáá
+Ess:^WG^RVSH%>žin flagK ;		! kuávdážin
+Ess:^WG^RLEN%>žin flagK ;			! kuávdáážin
!+Par:^WG^RLEN%>žid flagK ; 			! kuávdáážid
!+Par:^WG^RVSH%>žid flagK ;		! kuávdážid
+Cmp/SgNom:^WG^RLEN%>š RProp ; 

LEXICON PELES-plc !peles noun has also +v2 inflection, as 3-st noun
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:  Prop_MORCES ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: A_LASJ ;


LEXICON Prop_MORCES
+Sg+Nom:^WG^RVSH flagK ;  	! morčes
+Sg+Gen:^FCD flagK ;  			 	! morččá
+Sg+Acc:^FCD flagK ;   				! morččá
+Sg+Ill:^FCD%>s   flagK ;       		! morččás
+Sg+Loc:^FCD%>st flagK ;       	 	! morččást
+Sg+Com:^FCD%>in K; 				! morččáin
+Sg+Abe:^FCD^WG%>ttáá flagK ; ! morčáttáá
+Ess:^WG^RVSH%>in flagK ;  ! morčesin
!+Par:^WG^RVSH%>id flagK ;  ! morčesid



LEXICON LADDUUH-plc !!= * __@CODE@__  Similar to SPALVAAS plural
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: LADDUUH ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: A_LASJ ;
